italian_verbs.lexc
LEXICON Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Stem ! absolute past forms inflected like 'chiedere' & 'chiudere'
chiedere:chie									Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
dischiedere:dischie								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
incchiedere:inchie								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
richiedere:richie								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;

chiudere:chiu									Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
conchiudere:conchiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
dischiudere:dischiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
inchiudere:inchiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
ischiudere:ischiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
racchiudere:racchiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
richiudere:richiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
rinchiudere:rinchiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
schiudere:schiu									Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;
socchiudere:socchiu								Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending ;

LEXICON Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere_Group8_Ending		! absolute past forms inflected like 'chiedere' & 'chiudere'
+Ind+AbsPast+1Sg:si			# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Sg:desti		# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:se			# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+1Pl:demmo		# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Pl:deste		# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Pl:sero		# ;


LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Are ;
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ere ;
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire ;
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Isc ;

LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Stems ; ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'salire'
Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Stems ; ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'uscire'

LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Stems   ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'salire'
salire:					Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Endings ;
assalire:as				Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Endings ;
risalire:ri				Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Endings ;
soprassalire:sopras		Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Endings ;

LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group1_Endings  ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'salire'
+Sub+Pres+1Sg:salga		# ;
+Sub+Pres+2Sg:salga		# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Sg:salga		# ;
+Sub+Pres+1Pl:saliamo	# ;	
+Sub+Pres+2Pl:saliate	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Pl:salgano	# ;


LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Stems   ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'uscire'
uscire:							Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Endings ;
fuoriuscire:fuori				Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Endings ;
fuoruscire:fuor					Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Endings ;
riuscire:ri						Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Endings ;

LEXICON Irregular_Subjunctive_Present_Ire_Group2_Endings  ! Subjunctive present forms inflected like 'uscire'
+Sub+Pres+1Sg:esca		# ;
+Sub+Pres+2Sg:esca		# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Sg:esca		# ;
+Sub+Pres+1Pl:usciamo	# ;	
+Sub+Pres+2Pl:usciate	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Pl:escano	# ;



LEXICON Irregular_Participle
Irregular_Participle_Present ;
Irregular_Participle_Past	 ;

LEXICON Irregular_Participle_Past
Irregular_Participle_Past_Are		;
Irregular_Participle_Past_Ere		;
Irregular_Participle_Past_Ire		;
Irregular_Participle_Past_Isc		;

LEXICON Participle_Gender_Num
+Sg+M:o		# ;
+Pl+M:i		# ;
+Sg+F:a		# ;
+Pl+F:e		# ;





END 

LEXICON Irregular_Participle_Past_Ere
leggere+Part+Past:lett						Participle_Gender_Num ;
eleggere+Part+Past:elett					Participle_Gender_Num ;
preeleggere+Part+Past:preelett				Participle_Gender_Num ;
rieleggere+Part+Past:rielett				Participle_Gender_Num ;
rileggere+Part+Past:rilett					Participle_Gender_Num ;
straleggere+Part+Past:stralett				Participle_Gender_Num ;
prendere+Part+Past:pres				Participle_Gender_Num ;
apprendere+Part+Past:appres			Participle_Gender_Num ;
comprendere+Part+Past:compres		Participle_Gender_Num ;
disapprendere+Part+Past:disappres	Participle_Gender_Num ;
imprendere+Part+Past:impres			Participle_Gender_Num ;
intraprendere+Part+Past:intrapres		Participle_Gender_Num ;
rapprendere+Part+Past:rappres			Participle_Gender_Num ;
riprendere+Part+Past:ripres			Participle_Gender_Num ;
mettere+Part+Past:mess								Participle_Gender_Num ;
ammettere+Part+Past:ammess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
autoritrasmettere+Part+Past:autoritrasmess			Participle_Gender_Num ;
estromettere+Part+Past:estromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
commettere+Part+Past:commess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
dimettere+Part+Past:dimess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
discommettere+Part+Past:discommess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
dismettere+Part+Past:dismess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
dispromettere+Part+Past:dispromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
emettere+Part+Past:emess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
estromettere+Part+Past:estromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
fedecommettere+Part+Past:fedecommess				Participle_Gender_Num ;
frammettere+Part+Past:frammess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
immettere+Part+Past:immess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
impromettere+Part+Past:impromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
inframettere+Part+Past:inframess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
intermettere+Part+Past:intermess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
intremettere+Part+Past:intremess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
intromettere+Part+Past:intromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
malmettere+Part+Past:malmess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
manomettere+Part+Past:manomess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
omettere+Part+Past:omess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
permettere+Part+Past:permess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
premettere+Part+Past:premess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
pretermettere+Part+Past:pretermess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
promettere+Part+Past:promess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
radiostrasmettere+Part+Past:radiostrasmess			Participle_Gender_Num ;
reimmettere+Part+Past:reimmess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
riammettere+Part+Past:riammess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
ricetrasmettere+Part+Past:ricetrasmess				Participle_Gender_Num ;
ricommettere+Part+Past:ricommess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
riemettere+Part+Past:riemess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
rimettere+Part+Past:rimess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
ripromettere+Part+Past:ripromess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
ritrasmettere+Part+Past:ritrasmess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
scommettere+Part+Past:scommess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
smettere+Part+Past:smess							Participle_Gender_Num ;
sommettere+Part+Past:sommess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
soprammettere+Part+Past:soprammess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
sottomettere+Part+Past:sottomess					Participle_Gender_Num ;
spromettere+Part+Past:spromess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
telestrasmettere+Part+Past:telestrasmess			Participle_Gender_Num ;
tramettere+Part+Past:tramess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
trasmettere+Part+Past:trasmess						Participle_Gender_Num ;
videotrasmettere+Part+Past:videotrasmess			Participle_Gender_Num ;
chiedere+Part+Past:chiest							Participle_Gender_Num ;
dischiedere+Part+Past:dischiest						Participle_Gender_Num ;
inchiedere+Part+Past:inchiest						Participle_Gender_Num ;
richiedere+Part+Past:richiest						Participle_Gender_Num ;
chiudere+Part+Past:chius							Participle_Gender_Num ;
acchiudere+Part+Past:acchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
conchiudere+Part+Past:conchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
dischiudere+Part+Past:dischius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
inchiudere+Part+Past:inchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
ischiudere+Part+Past:ischius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
racchiudere+Part+Past:racchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
richiudere+Part+Past:richius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
rinchiudere+Part+Past:rinchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
schiudere+Part+Past:schius							Participle_Gender_Num ;
socchiudere+Part+Past:socchius						Participle_Gender_Num ;
nascere+Part+Past:nat								Participle_Gender_Num ;
scendere+Part+Past:sces								Participle_Gender_Num ;
rimanere+Part+Past:rimast							Participle_Gender_Num ;
